Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 227 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, as of December 31, 2025, all existing
single-family dwellings and multifamily residential units shall have at least one
(1) working hardwired or battery-powered:
(a) Smoke detector inside each dwelling or unit; and
(b) Carbon monoxide detector and fuel and gas leak detector, if a gas or liquid
fuel-fired appliance or heating equipment is used within the dwelling or
unit.
(2) Any required detector shall be installed in each dwelling or unit prior to the sale,
lease, change of ownership, or change in tenancy of the dwelling or unit.
(3) It shall be the responsibility of the property owner, seller, or lessor to test and
provide working detectors in the dwelling or unit. The seller or lessor shall attest
to the presence and functioning of the required detectors by providing a signed
affidavit to the:
(a) Purchaser at the real estate closing; or
(b) Lessee prior to the tenancy of the property.
(4) An individual licensed under KRS Chapter 324 shall not be liable for the actions
or inactions of a property owner or seller under this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/4/2024 10:49 AM Jacketed